Alaska, session 34, HB50.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 05.15.690(47) is amended to read: 04 (47) "snow classic" means a game of chance in which a prize of money 05 is awarded to the closest guess of the total snow accumulation on the ground at a 06 specific location [ON MOUNT ALYESKA] on a specific date and time [AND IS 07 LIMITED TO THE ALYESKA SNOW CLASSIC OPERATED AND 08 ADMINISTERED BY FOUR VALLEYS COMMUNITY SCHOOL, INC.]; Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.